Massachusetts, session 194th, S2393.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 19L the
following new section:-
Section 19M. An autonomous vehicle registered in this state must continue to meet
federal standards and regulations for a motor vehicle. The vehicle shall not be engaged in the
transport of interstate commerce or the transporting of passengers, or the transporting of goods
unless a human safety operator is physically present in the autonomous vehicle such that they
have the ability to monitor the performance of the vehicle and intervene if necessary, including
but not limited to operating or shutting off the vehicle. A human safety operator must continue to
meet all state and federal qualifications for automated and non-automated vehicles.
of 1